Maryland, session 2026, HB0801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0801*

HOUSE BILL 801
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–204.
(a) To the extent excluded from federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are added to the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(M) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY
GAIN FROM THE SALE OR EXCHANGE OF QUALIFIED SMALL BUSINESS STOCK
EXCLUDED FROM GROSS INCOME UNDER § 1202 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(N) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY AMOUNT IN
EXCESS OF $50,000 PAID OR INCURRED DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR:
(I) FOR FINES, PENALTIES, AND OTHER AMOUNTS THAT IS
REPORTED ON AN INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE FORM 1098–F OR A
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT FORM; AND
(II) THAT IS DEDUCTED AS A TRADE OR BUSINESS EXPENSE
UNDER § 162(F) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(2) THE ADDITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY AMOUNT PAID OR INCURRED AS TAXES DUE OR TO COME
INTO COMPLIANCE WITH ANY LAW THAT WAS VIOLATED.
10–210.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Depreciation” includes any deduction allowed under § 179 of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(3) “Heavy duty SUV” means a 4–wheeled vehicle that:
(i) is manufactured primarily for use on public streets, roads, and
highways;
(ii) is rated at more than 6,000 but not more than 14,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight; and
(iii) would be a passenger automobile as defined in § 280F of the

HOUSE BILL 801 3
Internal Revenue Code if it were rated at 6,000 pounds gross vehicle weight or less.
[(4) (i) “Manufacturing entity” means a person conducting or operating
a trade or business that is primarily engaged in activities that, in accordance with the
North American Industrial Classification System (NAICS), United States Manual, United
States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 Edition, would be included in Sector 31, 32,
or 33.
(ii) “Manufacturing entity” does not include a refiner, as defined in
§ 10–101 of the Business Regulation Article.]
(b) In addition to the modifications under §§ 10–204 through 10–210 of this
subtitle, to determine Maryland adjusted gross income of an individual:
(1) [(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item,] an amount is added
to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income to reflect the determination of the
depreciation deduction provided under § 167(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and the
adjusted basis of property without regard to the additional allowance under § 168(k) of the
Internal Revenue Code; [and
(ii) item (i) of this item does not apply to property placed in service
by a manufacturing entity on or after January 1, 2019;]
(2) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
to determine the net operating loss deduction allowed under § 172 of the Internal Revenue
Code without regard to an election under § 172(b)(1)(H) of the Internal Revenue Code for a
carryback period of up to 5 years;
(3) [(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item,] an amount is added
to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income to reflect the determination of the
maximum aggregate costs that the taxpayer may treat as an expense under § 179 of the
Internal Revenue Code for any taxable year without regard to any changes made to that
section after December 31, 2002:
[1.] (I) increasing above $25,000 the dollar limitation set
forth in § 179(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
[2.] (II) increasing above $200,000 the phase–out threshold
set forth in § 179(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code; [and
(ii) item (i) of this item does not apply to property that is placed in
service by a manufacturing entity on or after January 1, 2019;]
(4) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
to reflect the recognition of income from discharge of indebtedness and the allowance of any
deduction with respect to original issue discount without regard to § 108(i) of the Internal

HOUSE BILL 801
Revenue Code; and
(5) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
to reflect the determination of the depreciation deduction with respect to any heavy duty
SUV as if the heavy duty SUV were subject to the limitations of § 280F of the Internal
Revenue Code in the same manner as it would be if the vehicle were rated at 6,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight or less.
10–305.
(a) To the extent excluded from federal taxable income, the amounts under this
section are added to the federal taxable income of a corporation to determine Maryland
modified income.
(d) The addition under subsection (a) of this section includes the additions
required for an individual under:
(1) § 10–204(b) of this title (Dividends and interest from another state or
local obligation);
(2) § 10–204(c)(2) of this title (Federal tax–exempt income);
(3) § 10–204(e) of this title (Oil percentage depletion allowance);
(4) § 10–204(i) of this title (Deduction for qualified production activities
income);
(5) § 10–204(j) of this title (Deduction for costs for security clearance
administrative expenses and construction and equipment costs incurred to construct or
renovate a sensitive compartmented information facility); [and]
(6) § 10–204(l) of this title (Deduction for donations to qualified permanent
endowment funds);
(7) § 10–204(M) OF THIS TITLE (GAIN FROM THE SALE OR EXCHANGE
OF QUALIFIED SMALL BUSINESS STOCK); AND
(8) § 10–204(N) OF THIS TITLE (DEDUCTION FOR RESTITUTION).
10–310.
In addition to the modifications under §§ 10–305 through 10–309 of this subtitle, to
determine Maryland modified income the federal taxable income of a corporation shall be
adjusted as provided for an individual under § 10–210.1 of this title.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July

HOUSE BILL 801 5
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.